Utah statutes.
58-39a-5.   Qualifications for certification.

Applicants for certification as an alternative dispute resolution provider shall:

(1)  submit an application in a form as prescribed by the division;

(2)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(3)  be of good moral character; and

(4)  complete a program of education or training, or both, in ADR or have demonstrated sufficient experience in ADR, as determined by the division in collaboration with the board.

